Illinois, session 104th, SB3099.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Gun Trafficking Information Act is amended 5by changing Section 10-5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 830/10-5)7    Sec. 10-5. Gun trafficking information. 8    (a) The Illinois State Police shall use all reasonable 9efforts, as allowed by State law and regulations, federal law 10and regulations, and executed Memoranda of Understanding 11between Illinois law enforcement agencies and the U.S. Bureau 12of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, in making 13publicly available, on a regular and ongoing basis, key 14information related to firearms used in the commission of 15crimes in this State, including, but not limited to: reports 16on crimes committed with firearms, locations where the crimes 17occurred, the number of persons killed or injured in the 18commission of the crimes, whether or not a stolen firearm was 19used in the commission of the crimes, the state where the 20firearms used originated, the Federal Firearms Licensee that 21sold the firearm, the type of firearms used, if known, annual 22statistical information concerning Firearm Owner's 23Identification Card and concealed carry license applications,   SB3099- 2 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1revocations, and compliance with Section 9.5 of the Firearm 2Owners Identification Card Act, and the information required 3in the report or on the Illinois State Police's website under 4Section 85 of the Firearms Restraining Order Act, and firearm 5dealer license certification inspections. The Illinois State 6Police shall make the information available on its website, 7which may be presented in a dashboard format, in addition to 8electronically filing a report with the Governor and the 9General Assembly. The report to the General Assembly shall be 10filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the 11Secretary of the Senate in electronic form only, in the manner 12that the Clerk and the Secretary shall direct. 13    (b) The Illinois State Police shall study, on a regular 14and ongoing basis, and compile reports on the number of 15Firearm Owner's Identification Card checks to determine 16firearms trafficking or straw purchase patterns. The Illinois 17State Police shall, to the extent not inconsistent with law, 18share such reports and underlying data with academic centers, 19foundations, and law enforcement agencies studying firearms 20trafficking, provided that personally identifying information 21is protected. For purposes of this subsection (b), a Firearm 22Owner's Identification Card number is not personally 23identifying information, provided that no other personal 24information of the card holder is attached to the record. The 25Illinois State Police may create and attach an alternate 26unique identifying number to each Firearm Owner's   SB3099- 3 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1Identification Card number, instead of releasing the Firearm 2Owner's Identification Card number itself.3    (c) Each department, office, division, and agency of this 4State shall, to the extent not inconsistent with law, 5cooperate fully with the Illinois State Police and furnish the 6Illinois State Police with all relevant information and 7assistance on a timely basis as is necessary to accomplish the 8purpose of this Act. The Illinois Criminal Justice Information 9Authority shall submit the information required in subsection 10(a) of this Section to the Illinois State Police, and any other 11information as the Illinois State Police may request, to 12assist the Illinois State Police in carrying out its duties 13under this Act.14(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 104-31, eff. 1-1-26.) 15    Section 10. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 16Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 17Sections 2605-10, 2605-45, 2605-595, and 2605-605 as follows: 18    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-10)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part)19    Sec. 2605-10. Powers and duties, generally. 20    (a) The Illinois State Police shall exercise the rights, 21powers, and duties that have been vested in the Illinois State 22Police by the following:23        The Illinois State Police Act.24        The Illinois State Police Radio Act.  SB3099- 4 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1        The Criminal Identification Act.2        The Illinois Vehicle Code.3        The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.4        The Firearm Concealed Carry Act.5        The Firearm Dealer License Certification Act.6        The Intergovernmental Missing Child Recovery Act of 7    1984.8        The Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement Act.9        The Narcotic Control Division Abolition Act.10        The Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act.11        The Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth 12    Registration Act. 13    (b) The Illinois State Police shall have the powers and 14duties set forth in the following Sections. The Illinois State 15Police may receive revenue and real and personal property from 16any legal source, grants, pass-through grants, donations, and 17lawful appropriations. 18    (c) The Illinois State Police shall exercise the rights, 19powers, and duties vested in the Illinois State Police to 20implement the following protective service functions for State 21facilities, State officials, and State employees serving in 22their official capacity: 23        (1) Utilize subject matter expertise and law 24    enforcement authority to strengthen the protection of 25    State government facilities, State employees, State 26    officials, and State critical infrastructure.   SB3099- 5 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1        (2) Coordinate State, federal, and local law 2    enforcement activities involving the protection of State 3    facilities, officials, and employees. 4        (3) Conduct investigations of criminal threats to 5    State facilities, State critical infrastructure, State 6    officials, and State employees. 7        (4) Train State officials and employees in personal 8    protection, crime prevention, facility occupant emergency 9    planning, and incident management. 10        (5) Establish standard protocols for prevention and 11    response to criminal threats to State facilities, State 12    officials, State employees, and State critical 13    infrastructure and standard protocols for reporting of 14    suspicious activities. 15        (6) Establish minimum operational standards, 16    qualifications, training, and compliance requirements for 17    State employees and contractors engaged in the protection 18    of State facilities and employees. 19        (7) At the request of departments or agencies of State 20    government, conduct security assessments, including, but 21    not limited to, examination of alarm systems, cameras 22    systems, access points, personnel readiness, and emergency 23    protocols based on risk and need. 24        (8) Oversee the planning and implementation of 25    security and law enforcement activities necessary for the 26    protection of major, multi-jurisdictional events   SB3099- 6 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    implicating potential criminal threats to State officials, 2    State employees, or State-owned, State-leased, or 3    State-operated critical infrastructure or facilities. 4        (9) Oversee and direct the planning and implementation 5    of security and law enforcement activities by the 6    departments and agencies of the State necessary for the 7    protection of State employees, State officials, and 8    State-owned, State-leased, or State-operated critical 9    infrastructure or facilities from criminal activity. 10        (10) Advise the Governor and Homeland Security Advisor 11    on any matters necessary for the effective protection of 12    State facilities, critical infrastructure, officials, and 13    employees from criminal threats. 14        (11) Utilize intergovernmental agreements and 15    administrative rules as needed for the effective, 16    efficient implementation of law enforcement and support 17    activities necessary for the protection of State 18    facilities, State infrastructure, State employees, and, 19    upon the express written consent of State constitutional 20    officials, State constitutional officials. 21(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 22104-24, eff. 1-1-26.) 23    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-45)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-5)24    Sec. 2605-45. Division of Justice Services. 25    (a) The Division of Justice Services shall provide   SB3099- 7 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1administrative and technical services and support to the 2Illinois State Police, criminal justice agencies, and the 3public and shall exercise the following functions:4        (1) Operate and maintain the Law Enforcement Agencies 5    Data System (LEADS), a statewide, computerized 6    telecommunications system designed to provide services, 7    information, and capabilities to the law enforcement and 8    criminal justice community in the State of Illinois. The 9    Director is responsible for establishing policy, 10    procedures, and regulations consistent with State and 11    federal rules, policies, and law by which LEADS operates. 12    The Director shall designate a statewide LEADS 13    Administrator for management of the system. The Director 14    may appoint a LEADS Advisory Policy Board to reflect the 15    needs and desires of the law enforcement and criminal 16    justice community and to make recommendations concerning 17    policies and procedures.18        (2) Pursue research and the publication of studies 19    pertaining to local law enforcement activities.20        (3) Serve as the State's point of contact for the 21    Federal Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting 22    Program and National Incident-Based Reporting System.23        (4) Operate an electronic data processing and computer 24    center for the storage and retrieval of data pertaining to 25    criminal activity.26        (5) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested in   SB3099- 8 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    the Illinois State Police by the Cannabis Regulation and 2    Tax Act and the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 3    Program Act.4        (6) (Blank).5        (6.5) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested 6    in the Illinois State Police by the Firearm Owners 7    Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 8    the Firearm Transfer Inquiry Program, and the prohibited 9    persons portal under Section 2605-304, and the Firearm 10    Dealer License Certification Act.11        (7) Exercise other duties that may be assigned by the 12    Director to fulfill the responsibilities and achieve the 13    purposes of the Illinois State Police.14        (8) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested by 15    law in the Illinois State Police by the Criminal 16    Identification Act and the Illinois Uniform Conviction 17    Information Act. 18        (9) Exercise the powers and perform the duties that 19    have been vested in the Illinois State Police by the 20    Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Registration 21    Act, the Sex Offender Registration Act, and the Sex 22    Offender Community Notification Law and adopt reasonable 23    rules necessitated thereby. 24        (10) Serve as the State central repository for 25    criminal history record information.26        (11) Share all necessary information with the   SB3099- 9 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board and the Firearms 2    Owner's Identification Card Review Board necessary for the 3    execution of their duties.4        (12) Serve as the CJIS Systems Agency for Illinois.5    (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the CJIS 6Security Policy of the Federal Bureau of Investigation governs 7criminal justice information systems and requires all of those 8systems to be subject to a management control agreement 9controlled by the criminal justice agency that owns the 10criminal justice information system and to be subject to 11oversight by the CJIS Systems Agency. The CJIS Systems Agency 12shall establish principles and standards to provide 13consistency in the operation and use of criminal justice 14system information technology throughout the State. The CJIS 15Systems Agency may impose more stringent or additional 16protection measures than those measures outlined in the CJIS 17Security Policy of the Federal Bureau of Investigation if the 18protection measures are documented and maintained. State 19agencies and units of local government shall work with the 20CJIS Systems Agency to follow all principles and standards, 21including those imposed under this Section. Consistent with 22the CJIS Security Policy of the Federal Bureau of 23Investigation, no State agency, unit of local government, or 24employee of a State agency or unit of local government shall 25usurp, replace, or diminish the role and responsibility of the 26CJIS Information Security Officer or the CJIS Systems Officer   SB3099- 10 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1appointed by the head of the CJIS Systems Agency. 2(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 104-157, eff. 1-1-26.) 3    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-595)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-131)5    Sec. 2605-595. State Police Firearm Services Fund.6    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 7known as the State Police Firearm Services Fund. The Fund 8shall receive revenue under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 9the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, and Section 5 of 10the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. The Fund may also 11receive revenue from grants, pass-through grants, donations, 12appropriations, and any other legal source.13    (a-5) (Blank). 14    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 15finance any of its lawful purposes, mandates, functions, and 16duties under the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 17Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, and the Firearm 18Concealed Carry Act, including the cost of sending notices of 19expiration of Firearm Owner's Identification Cards, concealed 20carry licenses, the prompt and efficient processing of 21applications under the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act 22and the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the improved efficiency 23and reporting of the LEADS and federal NICS law enforcement 24data systems, and support for investigations required under 25these Acts and law. Any surplus funds beyond what is needed to   SB3099- 11 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1comply with the aforementioned purposes shall be used by the 2Illinois State Police to improve the Law Enforcement Agencies 3Data System (LEADS) and criminal history background check 4system. 5    (c) Investment income that is attributable to the 6investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 7for the uses specified in this Section. 8(Source: P.A. 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 9103-363, eff. 7-28-23.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-131)11    Sec. 2605-595. State Police Firearm Services Fund.12    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 13known as the State Police Firearm Services Fund. The Fund 14shall receive revenue under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 15the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, Article 24 of 16the Criminal Code of 2012, other provisions of law concerning 17firearm offenses, and Section 5 of the Firearm Owners 18Identification Card Act. The Fund may also receive revenue 19from grants, pass-through grants, donations, appropriations, 20and any other legal source.21    (a-5) (Blank). 22    (a-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 23contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 24provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 25of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as   SB3099- 12 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 2Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the State 3Police Firearm Enforcement Fund into the State Police Firearm 4Services Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the State 5Police Firearm Enforcement Fund is dissolved, and any future 6deposits due to that Fund and any outstanding obligations or 7liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the State Police 8Firearm Services Fund.9    (a-15) The Illinois State Police may use moneys from the 10Fund to establish task forces and, if necessary, include other 11law enforcement agencies, under intergovernmental contracts 12written and executed in conformity with the Intergovernmental 13Cooperation Act.14    (a-20) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the 15Fund to hire and train Illinois State Police officers and for 16the prevention of violent crime. 17    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 18finance any of its lawful purposes, mandates, functions, 19enforcement, and duties under the Firearm Owners 20Identification Card Act, the Firearm Dealer License 21Certification Act, Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 22provisions of law concerning firearm offenses, and the Firearm 23Concealed Carry Act, including the cost of sending notices of 24expiration of Firearm Owner's Identification Cards, concealed 25carry licenses, the prompt and efficient processing of 26applications under the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act   SB3099- 13 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1and the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the improved efficiency 2and reporting of the LEADS and federal NICS law enforcement 3data systems, and support for investigations required under 4these Acts and law. Any surplus funds beyond what is needed to 5comply with the aforementioned purposes shall be used by the 6Illinois State Police to improve the Law Enforcement Agencies 7Data System (LEADS) and criminal history background check 8system. 9    (b-5) Any surplus in the Fund beyond what is necessary to 10ensure compliance with subsections (a) through (b) or moneys 11that are specifically appropriated for those purposes shall be 12used by the Illinois State Police to award grants to assist 13with the data reporting requirements of the Gun Trafficking 14Information Act. 15    (c) Investment income that is attributable to the 16investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 17for the uses specified in this Section. 18(Source: P.A. 103-363, eff. 7-28-23; 104-131, eff. 9-1-26.) 19    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-605)20    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-131)21    Sec. 2605-605. Violent Crime Intelligence Task Force. The 22Director of the Illinois State Police shall establish a 23statewide multi-jurisdictional Violent Crime Intelligence Task 24Force led by the Illinois State Police dedicated to combating 25gun violence, gun-trafficking, and other violent crime with   SB3099- 14 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1the primary mission of preservation of life and reducing the 2occurrence and the fear of crime. The objectives of the Task 3Force shall include, but not be limited to, reducing and 4preventing illegal possession and use of firearms, 5firearm-related homicides, and other violent crimes, and 6solving firearm-related crimes. 7    (1) The Task Force may develop and acquire information, 8training, tools, and resources necessary to implement a 9data-driven approach to policing, with an emphasis on 10intelligence development.11    (2) The Task Force may utilize information sharing, 12partnerships, crime analysis, and evidence-based practices to 13assist in the reduction of firearm-related shootings, 14homicides, and gun-trafficking, including, but not limited to, 15ballistic data, eTrace data, DNA evidence, latent 16fingerprints, firearm training data, and National Integrated 17Ballistic Information Network (NIBIN) data. The Task Force may 18design a model crime gun intelligence strategy which may 19include, but is not limited to, comprehensive collection and 20documentation of all ballistic evidence, timely transfer of 21NIBIN and eTrace leads to an intelligence center, which may 22include the Division of Criminal Investigation of the Illinois 23State Police, timely dissemination of intelligence to 24investigators, investigative follow-up, and coordinated 25prosecution.26    (3) The Task Force may recognize and utilize best   SB3099- 15 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1practices of community policing and may develop potential 2partnerships with faith-based and community organizations to 3achieve its goals.4    (4) The Task Force may identify and utilize best practices 5in drug-diversion programs and other community-based services 6to redirect low-level offenders.7    (5) The Task Force may assist in violence suppression 8strategies including, but not limited to, details in 9identified locations that have shown to be the most prone to 10gun violence and violent crime, focused deterrence against 11violent gangs and groups considered responsible for the 12violence in communities, and other intelligence driven methods 13deemed necessary to interrupt cycles of violence or prevent 14retaliation.15    (6) In consultation with the Chief Procurement Officer, 16the Illinois State Police may obtain contracts for software, 17commodities, resources, and equipment to assist the Task Force 18with achieving this Act. Any contracts necessary to support 19the delivery of necessary software, commodities, resources, 20and equipment are not subject to the Illinois Procurement 21Code, except for Sections 20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and 22Article 50 of that Code, provided that the Chief Procurement 23Officer may, in writing with justification, waive any 24certification required under Article 50 of the Illinois 25Procurement Code.26    (7) The Task Force shall conduct enforcement operations   SB3099- 16 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1against persons whose Firearm Owner's Identification Cards 2have been revoked or suspended and persons who fail to comply 3with the requirements of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners 4Identification Card Act, prioritizing individuals presenting a 5clear and present danger to themselves or to others under 6paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 8.1 of the Firearm 7Owners Identification Card Act.8    (8) The Task Force shall collaborate with local law 9enforcement agencies to enforce provisions of the Firearm 10Owners Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry 11Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, and Article 1224 of the Criminal Code of 2012.13    (9) To implement this Section, the Director of the 14Illinois State Police may establish intergovernmental 15agreements with law enforcement agencies in accordance with 16the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act.17    (10) Law enforcement agencies that participate in 18activities described in paragraphs (7) through (9) may apply 19to the Illinois State Police for grants from the State Police 20Firearm Enforcement Fund. 21(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 22102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-131)24    Sec. 2605-605. Violent Crime Intelligence Task Force. The 25Director of the Illinois State Police shall establish a   SB3099- 17 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1statewide multi-jurisdictional Violent Crime Intelligence Task 2Force led by the Illinois State Police dedicated to combating 3gun violence, gun-trafficking, and other violent crime with 4the primary mission of preservation of life and reducing the 5occurrence and the fear of crime. The objectives of the Task 6Force shall include, but not be limited to, reducing and 7preventing illegal possession and use of firearms, 8firearm-related homicides, and other violent crimes, and 9solving firearm-related crimes. 10    (1) The Task Force may develop and acquire information, 11training, tools, and resources necessary to implement a 12data-driven approach to policing, with an emphasis on 13intelligence development.14    (2) The Task Force may utilize information sharing, 15partnerships, crime analysis, and evidence-based practices to 16assist in the reduction of firearm-related shootings, 17homicides, and gun-trafficking, including, but not limited to, 18ballistic data, eTrace data, DNA evidence, latent 19fingerprints, firearm training data, and National Integrated 20Ballistic Information Network (NIBIN) data. The Task Force may 21design a model crime gun intelligence strategy which may 22include, but is not limited to, comprehensive collection and 23documentation of all ballistic evidence, timely transfer of 24NIBIN and eTrace leads to an intelligence center, which may 25include the Division of Criminal Investigation of the Illinois 26State Police, timely dissemination of intelligence to   SB3099- 18 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1investigators, investigative follow-up, and coordinated 2prosecution.3    (3) The Task Force may recognize and utilize best 4practices of community policing and may develop potential 5partnerships with faith-based and community organizations to 6achieve its goals.7    (4) The Task Force may identify and utilize best practices 8in drug-diversion programs and other community-based services 9to redirect low-level offenders.10    (5) The Task Force may assist in violence suppression 11strategies including, but not limited to, details in 12identified locations that have shown to be the most prone to 13gun violence and violent crime, focused deterrence against 14violent gangs and groups considered responsible for the 15violence in communities, and other intelligence driven methods 16deemed necessary to interrupt cycles of violence or prevent 17retaliation.18    (6) In consultation with the Chief Procurement Officer, 19the Illinois State Police may obtain contracts for software, 20commodities, resources, and equipment to assist the Task Force 21with achieving this Act. Any contracts necessary to support 22the delivery of necessary software, commodities, resources, 23and equipment are not subject to the Illinois Procurement 24Code, except for Sections 20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and 25Article 50 of that Code, provided that the Chief Procurement 26Officer may, in writing with justification, waive any   SB3099- 19 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1certification required under Article 50 of the Illinois 2Procurement Code.3    (7) The Task Force shall conduct enforcement operations 4against persons whose Firearm Owner's Identification Cards 5have been revoked or suspended and persons who fail to comply 6with the requirements of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners 7Identification Card Act, prioritizing individuals presenting a 8clear and present danger to themselves or to others under 9paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 8.1 of the Firearm 10Owners Identification Card Act.11    (8) The Task Force shall collaborate with local law 12enforcement agencies to enforce provisions of the Firearm 13Owners Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry 14Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, and Article 1524 of the Criminal Code of 2012.16    (9) To implement this Section, the Director of the 17Illinois State Police may establish intergovernmental 18agreements with law enforcement agencies in accordance with 19the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act.20    (10) Law enforcement agencies that participate in 21activities described in paragraphs (7) through (9) may apply 22to the Illinois State Police for grants from the State Police 23Firearm Services Fund. 24(Source: P.A. 103-609, eff. 7-1-24; 104-131, eff. 9-1-26.) 25    Section 15. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by   SB3099- 20 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1changing Section 1-10 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 500/1-10)3    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)4    Sec. 1-10. Application. 5    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 6bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 7first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 8be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 9provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 10prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 11Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 12entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 13instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 14solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 15July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 16Code and its intent.17    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 18funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 19assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:20        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 21    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 22    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 23    this Code.24        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 25    Section 20-80.  SB3099- 21 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 2    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.3        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 4    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 5    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 6    that individual.7        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.8        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 9    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 10    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 11    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 12    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 13    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 14    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 15    contract.16        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 17    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 18    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 19    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 20    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 21    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 22    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 23    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 24    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.25        (8) (Blank).26        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois   SB3099- 22 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.2        (10) (Blank). 3        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 4    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 5    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 6    design-build agreements entered into according to the 7    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 8    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.9        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 10    professional and artistic services entered into by the 11    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 12    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 13    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 14    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 15    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 16    as well as the final approval by the members of the 17    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.18        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 19    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 20    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 21    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 22    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 23    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 24    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 25    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 26    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority   SB3099- 23 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    of the terms of the contract. 2        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 3    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 4    science services in consultation with and subject to the 5    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 6    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 7    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 8    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 9    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 10    writing with justification, waive any certification 11    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 12    for services which are currently provided by members of a 13    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 14    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 15    subcontracting shall be followed.16        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 17    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 18        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 19    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 20    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.21        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 22    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 23    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 24    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 25    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 26    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations,   SB3099- 24 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 2    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 3    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 4    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 5    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 6    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 7    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 8    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 9    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 10    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 11    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 12    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 13    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 14    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 15    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 16    the Illinois Municipal Code. 17        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 18    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 19    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 20    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 21        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 22    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 23    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 24    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 25    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 26    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access   SB3099- 25 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 2    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 3    Medical Cannabis Program Act.4        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 5    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 6    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 7    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 8    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 9    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 10    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 11    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 12    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 13    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 14    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 15    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 16    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 17    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 18    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 19    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 20    the procurement of goods and services identified in 21    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 22    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 23    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 24    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 25    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 26    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content   SB3099- 26 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 2    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 3    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 4    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 5    description of the supply or service provided, the total 6    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 7    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 8    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 9    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 10    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 11    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 12    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 13    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 14    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 15    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).16        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 17    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 18    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 19    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 20    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 21    complete the job application process and be considered for 22    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 23    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 24    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 25    the essential functions of the position held by that 26    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee   SB3099- 27 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 2    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 3    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 4    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 5    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 6    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 7        For purposes of this paragraph (19):8        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 9    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 10    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 11    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 12    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.13        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 14    directly assists an individual with a disability in 15    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 16    device.17        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 18    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 19    describing an individual with a disability. 20        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 21    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 22    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 23    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 24    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 25    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 26    Utilities Act, or a grid auditor pursuant to Section   SB3099- 28 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act. 2        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 3    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 4    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 5    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 6    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 7    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 8    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 9    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 10    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 11    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 12    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 13    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 14    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 15    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 16    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 17    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 18    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 19    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 20        (22) Contracts for project management services and 21    system integration services required for the completion of 22    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 23    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 24    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 25    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 26    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the   SB3099- 29 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 2    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 3    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 4    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 5        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 6    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 7    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 8    good faith determination that it is necessary and 9    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 10    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 11    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 12    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 13    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 14    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 15    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 16    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 17        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 18    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 19    announcements, and public awareness and education 20    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 21    providers of those services that inform the public on 22    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 23        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 24    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 25    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 26    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the   SB3099- 30 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 2    shall only be used for products and services procured 3    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 4    procurements may include those necessary to design and 5    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 6    services. The procurements may include, but are not 7    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 8    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 9    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 10    technical assistance and professional development, design 11    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 12    implement management and operational structures, and 13    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 14    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 15    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 16    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 17    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 18    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 19    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 20    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 21    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 22    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 23    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 24    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 25    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 26    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and   SB3099- 31 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    after July 1, 2027. 2        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 3    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 4    particularly minority candidates for employment, 5    including: 6            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 7        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;8            (B) production of recruitment materials; and9            (C) other services related to recruitment and 10        retention of State employees.11        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 12    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 13    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 14    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 15    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 16    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 17    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 18    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 19    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 20    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 21    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 22    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 23    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 24        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 25    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 26    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the   SB3099- 32 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 2    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 3    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 4    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 5    within this exemption. 6    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 7with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 8after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 9paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 10or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 11procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 12of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 13contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 14Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 15report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 16November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 17annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 18chief procurement officer. 19    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 20procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 21Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 22Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 23technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 24Illinois Power Agency Act. 25    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 26and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois   SB3099- 33 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 2procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 3Illinois Lottery Law. 4    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 5Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 6assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 7to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 8facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 9Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 10of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 11of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 12costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 13construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 14full duration of construction.15    (f) (Blank). 16    (g) (Blank).17    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 18contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 1911-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 20    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 21necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 22expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 23Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 24privilege. 25    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 26Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works   SB3099- 34 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 2Board Act. 3    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 4contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 5Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 6appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 7    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 8Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 9services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 10Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 11funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 12Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 13    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 14funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 15assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 16Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 17necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 18Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 19the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 20Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 21(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 22103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 236-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 24eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25) 25    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)  SB3099- 35 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Sec. 1-10. Application. 2    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 3bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 4first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 5be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 6provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 7prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 8Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 9entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 10instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 11solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 12July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 13Code and its intent.14    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 15funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 16assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:17        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 18    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 19    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 20    this Code.21        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 22    Section 20-80.23        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 24    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.25        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 26    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an   SB3099- 36 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 2    that individual.3        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.4        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 5    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 6    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 7    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 8    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 9    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 10    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 11    contract.12        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 13    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 14    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 15    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 16    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 17    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 18    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 19    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 20    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.21        (8) (Blank).22        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 23    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.24        (10) (Blank). 25        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 26    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the   SB3099- 37 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 2    design-build agreements entered into according to the 3    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 4    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.5        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 6    professional and artistic services entered into by the 7    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 8    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 9    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 10    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 11    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 12    as well as the final approval by the members of the 13    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.14        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 15    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 16    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 17    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 18    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 19    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 20    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 21    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 22    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 23    of the terms of the contract. 24        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 25    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 26    science services in consultation with and subject to the   SB3099- 38 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 2    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 3    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 4    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 5    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 6    writing with justification, waive any certification 7    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 8    for services which are currently provided by members of a 9    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 10    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 11    subcontracting shall be followed.12        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 13    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 14        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 15    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 16    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.17        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 18    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 19    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 20    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 21    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 22    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 23    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 24    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 25    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 26    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as   SB3099- 39 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 2    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 3    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 4    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 5    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 6    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 7    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 8    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 9    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 10    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 11    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 12    the Illinois Municipal Code. 13        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 14    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 15    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 16    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 17        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 18    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 19    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 20    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 21    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 22    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 23    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 24    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 25    Medical Cannabis Program Act.26        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements   SB3099- 40 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 2    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 3    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 4    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 5    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 6    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 7    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 8    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 9    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 10    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 11    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 12    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 13    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 14    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 15    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 16    the procurement of goods and services identified in 17    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 18    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 19    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 20    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 21    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 22    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 23    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 24    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 25    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 26    report shall include the name of the contractor, a   SB3099- 41 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    description of the supply or service provided, the total 2    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 3    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 4    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 5    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 6    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 7    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 8    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 9    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 10    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 11    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).12        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 13    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 14    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 15    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 16    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 17    complete the job application process and be considered for 18    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 19    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 20    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 21    the essential functions of the position held by that 22    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 23    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 24    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 25    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 26    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public   SB3099- 42 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 2    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 3        For purposes of this paragraph (19):4        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 5    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 6    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 7    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 8    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.9        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 10    directly assists an individual with a disability in 11    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 12    device.13        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 14    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 15    describing an individual with a disability. 16        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 17    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 18    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 19    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 20    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 21    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 22    Utilities Act, a grid auditor pursuant to Section 23    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act, a facilitator, 24    expert, or consultant pursuant to Sections 16-126.2 and 25    16-202 of the Public Utilities Act, a procurement monitor 26    pursuant to Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act,   SB3099- 43 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    an ombudsperson pursuant to Section 20-145 of the Public 2    Utilities Act, or consultants and experts pursuant to 3    Section 5-15 of the Utility Data Access Act. 4        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 5    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 6    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 7    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 8    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 9    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 10    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 11    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 12    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 13    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 14    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 15    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 16    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 17    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 18    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 19    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 20    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 21    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 22        (22) Contracts for project management services and 23    system integration services required for the completion of 24    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 25    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 26    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by   SB3099- 44 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 2    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 3    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 4    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 5    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 6    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 7        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 8    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 9    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 10    good faith determination that it is necessary and 11    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 12    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 13    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 14    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 15    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 16    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 17    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 18    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 19        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 20    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 21    announcements, and public awareness and education 22    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 23    providers of those services that inform the public on 24    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 25        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 26    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early   SB3099- 45 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 2    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 3    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 4    shall only be used for products and services procured 5    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 6    procurements may include those necessary to design and 7    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 8    services. The procurements may include, but are not 9    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 10    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 11    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 12    technical assistance and professional development, design 13    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 14    implement management and operational structures, and 15    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 16    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 17    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 18    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 19    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 20    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 21    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 22    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 23    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 24    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 25    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 26    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list   SB3099- 46 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 2    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 3    after July 1, 2027. 4        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 5    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 6    particularly minority candidates for employment, 7    including: 8            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 9        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;10            (B) production of recruitment materials; and11            (C) other services related to recruitment and 12        retention of State employees.13        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 14    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 15    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 16    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 17    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 18    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 19    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 20    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 21    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 22    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 23    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 24    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 25    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 26        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of   SB3099- 47 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 2    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 3    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 4    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 5    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 6    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 7    within this exemption. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 9with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 10after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 11paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 12or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 13procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 14of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 15contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 16Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 17report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 18November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 19annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 20chief procurement officer. 21    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 22procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 23Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 24Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 25technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 26Illinois Power Agency Act.   SB3099- 48 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 2and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 3Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 4procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 5Illinois Lottery Law. 6    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 7Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 8assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 9to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 10facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 11Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 12of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 13of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 14costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 15construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 16full duration of construction.17    (f) (Blank). 18    (g) (Blank).19    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 20contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 2111-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 22    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 23necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 24expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 25Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 26privilege.   SB3099- 49 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 2Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 3of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 4Board Act. 5    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 6contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 7Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 8appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 9    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 10Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 11services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 12Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 13funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 14Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 15    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 16funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 17assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 18Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 19necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 20Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 21the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 22Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 23(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 24103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 256-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 26eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-458, eff. 6-1-26;   SB3099- 50 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1revised 1-12-26.) 2    (430 ILCS 68/Act rep.)3    Section 20. The Firearm Dealer License Certification Act 4is repealed. 5    Section 25. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 6changing Section 24-5.1 as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 5/24-5.1)8    Sec. 24-5.1. Serialization of unfinished frames or 9receivers; prohibition on unserialized firearms; exceptions; 10penalties.11    (a) In this Section:12    "Bona fide supplier" means an established business entity 13engaged in the development and sale of firearms parts to one or 14more federal firearms manufacturers or federal firearms 15importers. 16    "Federal firearms dealer" means a licensed manufacturer 17pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(11).18    "Federal firearms importer" means a licensed importer 19pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(9).20    "Federal firearms manufacturer" means a licensed 21manufacturer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(10).22    "Frame or receiver" means a part of a firearm that, when 23the complete weapon is assembled, is visible from the exterior   SB3099- 51 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1and provides housing or a structure designed to hold or 2integrate one or more fire control components, even if pins or 3other attachments are required to connect those components to 4the housing or structure. For models of firearms in which 5multiple parts provide such housing or structure, the part or 6parts that the Director of the federal Bureau of Alcohol, 7Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives has determined are a frame or 8receiver constitute the frame or receiver. For purposes of 9this definition, "fire control component" means a component 10necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete, or continue 11the firing sequence, including any of the following: hammer, 12bolt, bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, 13firing pin, striker, or slide rails.14    "Security exemplar" means an object to be fabricated at 15the direction of the United States Attorney General that is 16(1) constructed of 3.7 ounces of material type 17-4 PH 17stainless steel in a shape resembling a handgun and (2) 18suitable for testing and calibrating metal detectors. 19    "Three-dimensional printer" means a computer or 20computer-drive machine capable of producing a 21three-dimensional object from a digital model.22    "Undetectable firearm" means (1) a firearm constructed 23entirely of non-metal substances; (2) a firearm that, after 24removal of all parts but the major components of the firearm, 25is not detectable by walk-through metal detectors calibrated 26and operated to detect the security exemplar; or (3) a firearm   SB3099- 52 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1that includes a major component of a firearm, which, if 2subject to the types of detection devices commonly used at 3airports for security screening, would not generate an image 4that accurately depicts the shape of the component. 5"Undetectable firearm" does not include a firearm subject to 6the provisions of 18 U.S.C. 922(p)(3) through (6). 7    "Unfinished frame or receiver" means any forging, casting, 8printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that:9        (1) has reached a stage in manufacture where it may 10    readily be completed, assembled, or converted to be a 11    functional firearm; or12        (2) is marketed or sold to the public to become or be 13    used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once 14    completed, assembled, or converted.15    "Unserialized" means lacking a serial number imprinted by:16        (1) a federal firearms manufacturer, federal firearms 17    importer, federal firearms dealer, or other federal 18    licensee authorized to provide marking services, pursuant 19    to a requirement under federal law; or20        (2) a federal firearms dealer or other federal 21    licensee authorized to provide marking services pursuant 22    to subsection (f) of this Section. 23    (b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly sell, offer 24to sell, or transfer an unserialized unfinished frame or 25receiver or unserialized firearm, including those produced 26using a three-dimensional printer, unless the party purchasing   SB3099- 53 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1or receiving the unfinished frame or receiver or unserialized 2firearm is a federal firearms importer, federal firearms 3manufacturer, or federal firearms dealer.4    (c) Beginning 180 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective 5date of Public Act 102-889), it is unlawful for any person to 6knowingly possess, transport, or receive an unfinished frame 7or receiver, unless:8        (1) the party possessing or receiving the unfinished 9    frame or receiver is a federal firearms importer or 10    federal firearms manufacturer;11        (2) the unfinished frame or receiver is possessed or 12    transported by a person for transfer to a federal firearms 13    importer or federal firearms manufacturer; or14        (3) the unfinished frame or receiver has been 15    imprinted with a serial number issued by a federal 16    firearms importer or federal firearms manufacturer in 17    compliance with subsection (f) of this Section. 18    (d) Beginning 180 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective 19date of Public Act 102-889), unless the party receiving the 20firearm is a federal firearms importer or federal firearms 21manufacturer, it is unlawful for any person to knowingly 22possess, purchase, transport, or receive a firearm that is not 23imprinted with a serial number by (1) a federal firearms 24importer or federal firearms manufacturer in compliance with 25all federal laws and regulations regulating the manufacture 26and import of firearms or (2) a federal firearms manufacturer,   SB3099- 54 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1federal firearms dealer, or other federal licensee authorized 2to provide marking services in compliance with the 3unserialized firearm serialization process under subsection 4(f) of this Section. 5    (e) Any firearm or unfinished frame or receiver 6manufactured using a three-dimensional printer must also be 7serialized in accordance with the requirements of subsection 8(f) within 30 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective date of 9Public Act 102-889), or prior to reaching a stage of 10manufacture where it may be readily completed, assembled, or 11converted to be a functional firearm.12    (f) Unserialized unfinished frames or receivers and 13unserialized firearms serialized pursuant to this Section 14shall be serialized in compliance with all of the following:15        (1) An unserialized unfinished frame or receiver and 16    unserialized firearm shall be serialized by a federally 17    licensed firearms dealer or other federal licensee 18    authorized to provide marking services with the licensee's 19    abbreviated federal firearms license number as a prefix 20    (which is the first 3 and last 5 digits) followed by a 21    hyphen, and then followed by a number as a suffix, such as 22    12345678-(number). The serial number or numbers must be 23    placed in a manner that accords with the requirements 24    under federal law for affixing serial numbers to firearms, 25    including the requirements that the serial number or 26    numbers be at the minimum size and depth, and not   SB3099- 55 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    susceptible to being readily obliterated, altered, or 2    removed, and the licensee must retain records that accord 3    with the requirements under federal law in the case of the 4    sale of a firearm. The imprinting of any serial number 5    upon an undetectable firearm must be done on a steel 6    plaque in compliance with 18 U.S.C. 922(p).7        (2) Every federally licensed firearms dealer or other 8    federal licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or 9    otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique 10    serial number pursuant to this Section shall maintain a 11    record of such indefinitely. Licensees subject to the 12    Firearm Dealer License Certification Act shall make all 13    records accessible for inspection upon the request of the 14    Illinois State Police or a law enforcement agency in 15    accordance with Section 5-35 of the Firearm Dealer License 16    Certification Act.17        (3) Every federally licensed firearms dealer or other 18    federal licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or 19    otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique 20    serial number pursuant to this Section shall record it at 21    the time of every transaction involving the transfer of a 22    firearm, rifle, shotgun, finished frame or receiver, or 23    unfinished frame or receiver that has been so marked in 24    compliance with the federal guidelines set forth in 27 CFR 25    478.124.26        (4) Every federally licensed firearms dealer or other   SB3099- 56 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    federal licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or 2    otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique 3    serial number pursuant to this Section shall review and 4    confirm the validity of the owner's Firearm Owner's 5    Identification Card issued under the Firearm Owners 6    Identification Card Act prior to returning the firearm to 7    the owner.8    (g) Within 30 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective date 9of Public Act 102-889), the Director of the Illinois State 10Police shall issue a public notice regarding the provisions of 11this Section. The notice shall include posting on the Illinois 12State Police website and may include written notification or 13any other means of communication statewide to all 14Illinois-based federal firearms manufacturers, federal 15firearms dealers, or other federal licensees authorized to 16provide marking services in compliance with the serialization 17process in subsection (f) in order to educate the public.18    (h) Exceptions. This Section does not apply to an 19unserialized unfinished frame or receiver or an unserialized 20firearm that:21        (1) has been rendered permanently inoperable;22        (2) is an antique firearm, as defined in 18 U.S.C. 23    921(a)(16);24        (3) was manufactured prior to October 22, 1968;25        (4) is an unfinished frame or receiver and is 26    possessed by a bona fide supplier exclusively for transfer   SB3099- 57 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    to a federal firearms manufacturer or federal firearms 2    importer, or is possessed by a federal firearms 3    manufacturer or federal firearms importer in compliance 4    with all federal laws and regulations regulating the 5    manufacture and import of firearms; except this exemption 6    does not apply if an unfinished frame or receiver is 7    possessed for transfer or is transferred to a person other 8    than a federal firearms manufacturer or federal firearms 9    importer; or 10        (5) is possessed by a person who received the 11    unserialized unfinished frame or receiver or unserialized 12    firearm through inheritance, and is not otherwise 13    prohibited from possessing the unserialized unfinished 14    frame or receiver or unserialized firearm, for a period 15    not exceeding 30 days after inheriting the unserialized 16    unfinished frame or receiver or unserialized firearm. 17    (i) Penalties.18        (1) A person who violates subsection (c) or (d) is 19    guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first violation and 20    is guilty of a Class 3 felony for a second or subsequent 21    violation.22        (2) A person who violates subsection (b) is guilty of 23    a Class 4 felony for a first violation and is guilty of a 24    Class 2 felony for a second or subsequent violation.25(Source: P.A. 102-889, eff. 5-18-22; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   SB3099- 58 -LRB104 18899 RLC 32344 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.